West Virginia, session 2026, HB4536.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE, waiver of examination, EXPIRATION AND RENEWAL. §17B-2-16. Waiver of examinations. (a) The Division of Motor Vehicles shall examine every applicant for an operator’s license before issuing any such license, except as otherwise provided in this article. (b) Written and road skill examinations for students duly enrolled in a driver education course will be administered by driver education teachers certified by the West Virginia Department of Education. Upon successful completion of the driver education course, the certified teacher must issue a "High School Driver Education Certificate" which will be accepted in lieu of the written and road skill examinations administered by the Division of Motor Vehicles for a period of six months from the date of issue. No further testing by the Division of Motor Vehicles is required unless the High School Driver Education Certificate has expired; in such event, full testing is required. All persons under age 18 who transfer their out-of-state license for a West Virginia license must be given a written and road test by the Division of Motor Vehicles.(c) All fees applicable for the issuance of a driver's license shall be paid to the Division of Motor Vehicles upon acceptance of a valid "High School Driver Education Certificate".